Utah statutes.
75-2a-123.   Pregnancy.

(1)  A health care directive that provides for the withholding or withdrawal of life sustaining procedures has no force during the course of a declarant's pregnancy.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not negate the appointment of a health care agent during the course of a declarant's pregnancy.

